Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.047

Veterinarian health program—Content—License surcharge.

(1) To implement a veterinarian health program as authorized by RCW 18.130.175, the veterinary board of governors shall enter into a contract with a physician health program or a voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program. The veterinarian health program may include any or all of the following:

(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d) Referring impaired veterinarians to treatment programs;

(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired veterinarians including those ordered by the board;

(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired veterinarians; and

(g) Performing other related activities as determined by the board.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by a surcharge of $35 per year or equivalent on each license issuance or renewal of a new license to be collected by the department of health from every veterinarian licensed under this chapter. These moneys shall be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for the implementation of the veterinarian health program.

[ 2024 c 15 s 7; 2022 c 43 s 8; 2016 c 42 s 3; 1991 c 3 s 241; 1989 c 125 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2024 c 15: See note following RCW 18.71.310.